Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-104
Candidate, defined.

Candidate shall mean a registered voter for whom votes may be cast at any election and who, either tacitly or expressly, consents to be considered. Candidate shall not include a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States or a candidate for delegate to a county, state, or national political party convention.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 20.